Utah statutes.
78B-15-504.   Report of genetic testing.

(1)  A report of genetic testing must be in a record and signed under penalty of perjury by a designee of the testing laboratory.  A report made under the requirements of this part is self-authenticating.

(2)  Documentation from the testing laboratory of the following information is sufficient to establish a reliable chain of custody that allows the results of genetic testing to be admissible without testimony:

(a)  the names and photographs of the individuals whose specimens have been taken;

(b)  the names of the individuals who collected the specimens;

(c)  the places and dates the specimens were collected;

(d)  the names of the individuals who received the specimens in the testing laboratory;

(e)  the dates the specimens were received; and

(f)  the finger prints of the individuals whose specimens have been taken.

